it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori per percussioni: Piatti e tamburo; Sordine per piatti e tamburi; Timpani tamburo; Chiavi per tamburo; Kit per percussioni; Accessori per bacchette e spazzole da batteria; Bacchette e spazzole da batteria; Moduli per batterie elettroniche; Accessori per percussioni a mano; Mazzuole per percussioni; Supporti per percussioni
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ κρουστών: Θήκες για κύμβαλα & τύμπανα; Σιγαστήρες κυμβάλων και τυμπάνων; Κεφαλές τυμπάνων; Κλειδιά για τύμπανα; Υλικό Κιτ τυμπάνων; Αξεσουάρ σε μπαγκέτες και σκουπάκια για ντραμς; Μπαγκέτες & βούρτσες τυμπάνων; Ηλεκτρονικές μονάδες τυμπάνων; Αξεσουάρ κρουστών χειρός; Μαλέτες για κρουστά; Βάσεις κρουστών
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor percussie-instrumenten: Bekken- en drumkoffers; Dempers voor cimbalen en drums; Trommelvellen; Drumsleutels; Hardware voor drumstellen; Accessoires voor drumstokken en -brushes; Drumstokken en -brushes; Elektronische drummodules; Accessoires voor handpercussie-instrumenten; Paukenstokken voor percussie-instrumenten; Standaards voor percussie-instrumenten
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till slagverk: Cymbal- och trumfodral; Cymbal- och trumdämpare; Trummembran; Trumnycklar; Utrustning till trumset; Tillbehör till trumstockar och -vispar; Trumstockar och -vispar; Elektroniska trummoduler; Tillbehör för handhållna slagverk; Slagverksklubbor; Slagverksställningar
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 打击乐器配件: 铙钹/鼓盒; 铙钹/鼓类弱音器; 鼓面; 鼓钥匙; 架子鼓/爵士鼓硬件; 鼓槌/鼓刷配件; 鼓槌/鼓刷; 电子鼓声模块; 手动打击乐器配件; 打击乐器槌棒; 打击乐器支架
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Perkussiotarvikkeet: Symbaali- ja rumpukotelot; Symbaali- ja rumpuvaimentimet; Rumpukalvot; Rumpuavaimet; Rumputelineet; Rumpukapuloiden ja -sutien tarvikkeet; Rumpukapulat ja -sudit; Sähkörumpujen moduulit; Käsiperkussiotarvikkeet; Perkussiokapulat; Perkussioständit
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para percussão: Estojos para címbalos e baterias; Pele para címbalo e bateria; Peles para bateria; Chaves de afinação para bateria; Peças de bateria; Acessórios para baquetas e vassouras; Baquetas e vassouras para baterias; Módulos de bateria eletrônica; Acessórios para instrumentos de percussão de mão; Bilros de percussão; Suportes para instrumentos de percussão
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Mušamųjų instrumentų priedai: Lėkščių ir būgnų dėklai; Lėkščių ir būgnų surdinos; Būgnų plastikai; Būgnų klavišai; Būgnų komplektų įranga; Būgnų lazdelės ir šepečių priedai; Būgnų lazdelės ir šepečiai; Elektroninių būgnų moduliai; Rankinių mušamųjų instrumentų priedai; Mušamųjų instrumentų muštukai; Mušamųjų instrumentų vertikalūs stovai
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Pribor za udaraljke: Sanduci za činele i bubnjeve; Sordine za činele i bubnjeve; Glave bubnja; Ključevi za bubanj; Oprema za bubnjarski komplet; Dodaci za palice i metlice za bubanj; Palice i metlice za bubnjeve; Moduli za električne bubnjeve; Pribor za ručne udaraljke; Maljevi za udaraljke; Postolje za udaraljke
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre bicie nástroje: Obaly na činely a bubny; Dusítka na činely a bubny; Blany bubnov; Ladička na bicie; Súprava náradia pre bicie; Príslušenstvo k paličkám a metličkám; Paličky a metličky na bicie; Moduly elektronických bicích; Príslušenstvo pre ručné perkusie; Perkusné paličky; Stojany na perkusné nástroje
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para percusión: Estuches para platillos y tambores; Sordinas para platillos y tambores; Parches para tambores; Llaves de afinación para tambores; Soportes y taburetes para baterías; Accesorios para baquetas y escobillas; Baquetas y escobillas; Módulos para baterías electrónicas; Accesorios para percusión de mano; Mazos de percusión; Bases para percusión
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện bộ gõ: Bao, hộp đựng trống và chũm chọe; Chũm chọe và đệm giảm thanh cho trống; Mặt trống; Khóa căn mặt trống; Chân trống; Phụ kiện dùi và dùi chổi đánh trống; Dùi chổi và gậy đánh trống; Module trống điện tử; Phụ kiện nhạc cụ bộ gõ đánh tay; Dùi gõ; Giá đỡ nhạc cụ bộ gõ
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์เครื่องเพอร์คัสชั่น: ที่ใส่ฉาบและกลอง; ที่ลดเสียงฉาบและกลอง; หนังกลอง; กุญแจกลอง; ฮาร์ดแวร์ชุดกลอง; อุปกรณ์ไม้และแส้ตีกลอง; ไม้ตีกลองและบรัช; โมดูลกลองไฟฟ้า; อุปกรณ์เครื่องเคาะจังหวะด้วยมือ; ไม้ตีเครื่องกระทบ; ที่ตั้งเครื่องเคาะจังหวะ
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 打楽器・パーカッション用品: シンバル・ドラム用ケース; シンバル・ドラム用ミュート; ドラムヘッド; ドラムキー; ドラムセットパーツ; ドラムスティック・ドラムブラシ用品; ドラムスティック・ドラムブラシ; 電子ドラムモジュール; ハンドパーカッション用品; 打楽器用マレット; パーカッションスタンド
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour percussions: Boîtes pour cymbales et tambours; Sourdines pour cymbales et tambours; Peaux de tambour; Clés de tambour; Matériel pour batteries; Accessoires pour baguettes et balais de batterie; Baguettes et balais de batterie; Modules de son pour batteries électroniques; Accessoires pour percussions à main; Maillets de percussions; Supports pour percussions
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > Percussion Accessories: Cymbal & Drum Cases; Cymbal & Drum Mutes; Drum Heads; Drum Keys; Drum Kit Hardware; Drum Stick & Brush Accessories; Drum Sticks & Brushes; Electronic Drum Modules; Hand Percussion Accessories; Percussion Mallets; Percussion Stands
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru percuție: Cutii pentru cimbal și tobe; Surdine pentru cimbal și tobe; Capete de tobe; Chei tobe; Hardware pentru set de tobe; Accesorii pentru bețe și perii; Bețe și perii; Module tobe electronice; Accesorii pentru percuție manuală; Ciocănele pentru percuție; Stative pentru percuție
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Ütős kiegészítők: Cintányér- és dobtokok; Cintányér- és dobnémítók; Dobfejek; Dobbillentyűk; Dobkészletelemek; Dobverő és -kefekiegészítők; Dobverők és -kefék; Elektronikusdob-modulok; Kézi ütős kiegészítők; Ütős kalapácsok; Ütős tartók
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do perkusji: Futerały na talerze i bębny; Tłumiki do perkusji; Naciągi perkusyjne; Klucze do strojenia perkusji; Osprzęt do perkusji; Akcesoria do pałek i miotełek perkusyjnych; Pałki i miotełki perkusyjne; Automaty perkusyjne; Akcesoria do ręcznych instrumentów perkusyjnych; Młotki perkusyjne; Stojaki do perkusji
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Vurmalı Çalgı Aksesuarları: Büyük Zil ve Davul Çantaları; Simbal ve Davul Susturucular; Davul Derileri; Davul Anahtarları; Bateri Elemanları; Baget ve Fırça Baget Aksesuarları; Bagetler ve Fırça Bagetler; Elektronik Davul Modülleri; El Perküsyonu Aksesuarları; Perküsyon Tokmakları; Perküsyon Stantları
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 打擊樂器配件: 鼓鈸收納箱; 鼓鈸/鼓組消音墊; 鼓筒頭; 調音鼓鎖; 爵士鼓套組硬體; 鼓棒/鼓刷配件; 鼓棒和鼓刷; 電子鼓套組; 手擊樂器配件; 琴槌; 手擊樂器立架
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Bicí – příslušenství: Pouzdra na činely a bubny; Tlumítka činelů a bubnů; Blány na bubny; Klíče na bubny; Hardware pro bicí; Příslušenství k paličkám a metličkám; Paličky a metličky; Bicí zvukové moduly; Ruční perkuse – příslušenství; Paličky k bicím nástrojům; Stojany na perkuse
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 타악기 부대용품: 심벌즈/드럼 케이스; 심벌즈/드럼 뮤트; 드럼 헤드; 드럼키; 드럼 세트 장비; 드럼 스틱/브러시 부대용품; 드럼 스틱/브러시; 전자 드럼 모듈; 손 타악기 부대용품; 타악기채; 타악기 스탠드
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за перкусии: Калъфи за чинели и барабани; Заглушители на чинели и барабани; Кожи за барабани; Ключове за барабани; Оборудване за комплекти за барабани; Аксесоари за барабанни палки и четки; Палки и четки за барабани; Модулни електронни барабанни; Аксесоари за ръчни перкусии; Палки за перкусии; Стойки за перкусии
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для ударных инструментов: Сумки для тарелок и барабанов; Сурдины для тарелок и барабанов; Пластики для барабанов; Барабанные ключи; Оборудование для барабанных установок; Аксессуары для барабанных палочек и щеток; Барабанные палочки и щетки; Модули для электронных барабанных установок; Аксессуары для ручной перкуссии; Колотушки для ударных инструментов; Стойки для ударных инструментов
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de percussão: Estojos de bateria e címbalo; Surdinas de bateria e címbalo; Peles de bateria; Chaves de bateria; Equipamento de kit de bateria; Acessórios de baqueta e vassoura para bateria; Baquetas e vassouras para bateria; Módulos de bateria eletrónica; Acessórios de percussão manual; Maletas de percussão; Suportes de percussão
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za tolkala: Kovčki za činele in bobne; Dušilci za činele in bobne; Glave bobnov; Ključi za bobne; Pribor za komplete bobnov; Dodatki za bobnarske palice in metlice; Bobnarske palice in metlice; Moduli za elektronske bobne; Dodatki za ročna tolkala; Palice za tolkala; Stojala za tolkala
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Perkussion – tilbehør: Tasker til bækkener og trommer; Bækken- og trommedæmpere; Trommeskind; Trommenøgle; Trommesæt – hardware; Trommestikker – tilbehør; Trommestikker og brushes; Elektroniske trommemoduler; Tilbehør til håndpercussion; Perkussionkøller; Percussionstativer
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Schlagzeugzubehör: Schlagzeugkoffer; Dämpfer für Schlagzeug & Becken; Schlagzeugfelle; Stimmschlüssel; Schlagzeug-Hardware; Zubehör für Sticks & Besen; Sticks & Besen; Module für elektronische Schlagzeuge; Zubehör für Handperkussionsinstrumente; Trommelschlägel; Ständer für Perkussionsinstrumente
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Perkusjonstilbehør: Symbal- og trommevesker; Symbal- og trommemuter; Trommeskinn; Trommenøkler; Sett med trommedeler; Tilbehør til trommestikker og -børster; Trommestikker og -børster; Elektroniske trommemoduler; Tilbehør til håndperkusjon; Perkusjonhammere; Perkusjonsstativer